Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1738
Disclosure document; disclose existence of bond or trust account.

If the seller is required to secure a bond or establish a trust account pursuant to the requirements of sections 59-1726 to 59-1728, the disclosure document required by section 59-1732 shall state either:

(1) Seller has secured a bond issued by ............., (name and address of surety company) a surety company admitted to do business in this state. Before signing a contract to purchase this seller-assisted marketing plan, you should check with the surety company to determine the bond's current status; or

(2) Seller has deposited with the Department of Banking and Finance information regarding its trust account. Before signing a contract to purchase this seller-assisted marketing plan, you should check with the Department of Banking and Finance to determine the current status of the trust account.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 38;

Laws 1983, LB 461, § 7.